Tennessee, session 114, HB1063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-5-101(f)(6), is amended by
deleting "Prior to January 1, 2008, and each January 1 thereafter" and substituting "Prior to
January 15 of each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1063
002777
- 1 -